Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.355

School safety and security staff.

RCW 28A.320.1241, 28A.400.345, 28A.320.1242, and 28A.320.124 govern school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and apply to charter schools established under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 38 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 38: See note following RCW 28A.400.345.